District of Columbia statutes.
13-434

Assistance to tribunals and litigants outside the District of Columbia.

(a)

A District of Columbia court may order service upon any person who is domiciled or can be found within the District of Columbia of any document issued in connection with a proceeding in a tribunal outside the District of Columbia. The order may be made upon application of any interested person or in response to a letter rogatory issued by a tribunal outside the District of Columbia and shall direct the manner of service.

(b)

Service in connection with a proceeding in a tribunal outside the District of Columbia may be made within the District of Columbia without an order of court.

(c)

Service under this section does not, of itself, require the recognition or enforcement of an order, judgment, or decree rendered outside the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)
1981 Ed., § 13-434.
1973 Ed., § 13-434.